North Carolina statutes. Chapter 65. Cemeteries.
Article 2. Care of Confederate Cemetery.

§ 65-4.
State Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety to furnish labor. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety is hereby authorized and directed to furnish at such time, or times, as may be convenient, such prisoner’s labor as may be available, to properly care for the Confederate Cemetery situated in the City of Raleigh, such services to be rendered by the State’s prisoners without compensation.

History.

1927, c. 224, s. 1; 1933, c. 172; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 32; 2017-186, s. 2(qqqq).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction” at the beginning.

Session Laws 2012-83, s. 32, effective June 26, 2012, deleted “State” preceding “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety.”

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(qqqq), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” near the beginning of this section.

§ 65-4.
State Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction to furnish labor. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction is hereby authorized and directed to furnish at such time, or times, as may be convenient, such prisoner’s labor as may be available, to properly care for the Confederate Cemetery situated in the City of Raleigh, such services to be rendered by the State’s prisoners without compensation.

History.

1927, c. 224, s. 1; 1933, c. 172; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 32; 2017-186, s. 2(qqqq); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction” at the beginning.

Session Laws 2012-83, s. 32, effective June 26, 2012, deleted “State” preceding “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety.”

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(qqqq), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” near the beginning of this section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the section heading and at the beginning of this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.